Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 8. Duties and Powers of Trustee.

§ 64.2-763.
Duty to administer trust and invest.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust and invest trust assets in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with this chapter. In administering, managing and investing trust assets, the trustee shall comply with the provisions of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act (§

64.2-780

et seq.) and the Uniform Principal and Income Act (§

64.2-1000

et seq.).

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.01; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-764.
Duty of loyalty.

A trustee shall administer the trust solely in the interests of the beneficiaries.

Subject to the rights of persons dealing with or assisting the trustee as provided in §

64.2-803

, a sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property entered into by the trustee for the trustee’s own personal account or that is otherwise affected by a conflict between the trustee’s fiduciary and personal interests is voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:

The transaction was authorized by the terms of the trust;

The transaction was approved by the court;

The beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within the time allowed by §

64.2-796

;

The beneficiary consented to the trustee’s conduct, ratified the transaction, or released the trustee in compliance with §

64.2-800

; or

The transaction involves a contract entered into or claim acquired by the trustee before the person became or contemplated becoming trustee.

A sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or management of trust property is presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if it is entered into by the trustee with:

The trustee’s spouse;

The trustee’s descendants, siblings, parents, or their spouses;

An agent or attorney of the trustee; or

A corporation or other person or enterprise in which the trustee, or a person that owns a significant interest in the trustee, has an interest that might affect the trustee’s best judgment.

A transaction between a trustee and a beneficiary that does not concern trust property but that occurs during the existence of the trust or while the trustee retains significant influence over the beneficiary and from which the trustee obtains an advantage beyond the normal commercial advantage from such transaction is voidable by the beneficiary unless the trustee establishes that the transaction was fair to the beneficiary.

A transaction not concerning trust property in which the trustee engages in the trustee’s individual capacity involves a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the transaction concerns an opportunity properly belonging to the trust.

An investment by a trustee in securities of an investment company, investment trust, mutual fund, or other investment or financial product to which the trustee, or an affiliate of the trustee, sponsors, sells, or provides services in a capacity other than as trustee is not presumed to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests if the investment otherwise complies with the Uniform Prudent Investor Act (§

64.2-780

et seq.) and §

64.2-1506

. The trustee may be compensated by the investment company, investment trust, mutual fund, or other investment or financial product, or by the affiliated entity sponsoring, selling, or providing such service, and such compensation may be in addition to the compensation the trustee is receiving as a trustee if the trustee notifies the persons entitled to receive a copy of the trustee’s annual report under §

64.2-775

of the rate and method by which that compensation was determined and of any subsequent changes to such rate or method of compensation.

In voting shares of stock or in exercising powers of control over similar interests in other forms of enterprise, the trustee shall act in the best interests of the beneficiaries. If the trust is the sole owner of a corporation or other form of enterprise, the trustee shall elect or appoint directors or other managers who will manage the corporation or enterprise in the best interests of the beneficiaries.

This section does not preclude the following transactions, if fair to the beneficiaries:

An agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to the appointment or compensation of the trustee;

Payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee;

A transaction between a trust and another trust, decedent’s estate, or conservatorship of which the trustee is a fiduciary or in which a beneficiary has an interest;

A deposit of trust money in a regulated financial service institution operated by the trustee; or

An advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust.

The court may appoint a special fiduciary to make a decision with respect to any proposed transaction that might violate this section if entered into by the trustee.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.02; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-765.
Impartiality.

If a trust has two or more beneficiaries, the trustee shall act impartially in investing, managing, and distributing the trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries’ respective interests.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.03; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-766.
Prudent administration.

A trustee shall administer the trust as a prudent person would, by considering the purposes, terms, distributional requirements, and other circumstances of the trust. In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.04; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 25 Personal Representatives; Rights and Duties.
§ 25.23 In What Securities May Invest. Cox.

§ 64.2-767.
Costs of administration.

In administering a trust, the trustee may incur only costs that are reasonable in relation to the trust property, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trustee.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.05; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-768.
Trustee’s skills.

A trustee who has special skills or expertise, or is named trustee in reliance upon the trustee’s representation that the trustee has special skills or expertise, shall use those special skills or expertise.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.06; 2012, c. 614.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Practice and Procedure. —

Successor trustee sufficiently pleaded claims against the former and initial trustee of the trust for breach of fiduciary duty because the successor trustee alleged that an insurance policy to fund a trust lapsed due to lack of a premium payment by the former and initial trustee. Tillar v. Stump, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 155 (Richmond July 3, 2013).

§ 64.2-769.
Delegation by trustee.

A trustee may delegate duties and powers that a prudent trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate under the circumstances. The trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:

Selecting an agent;

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust; and

Periodically reviewing the agent’s actions in order to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the trust to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

A trustee who complies with subsection A is not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for an action of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting a delegation of powers or duties from the trustee of a trust that is subject to the law of the Commonwealth, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.07; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-770.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 768, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

64.2-770

, pertaining to power to direct, derived from Acts 2005, c. 935, § 55-548.08; 2012, cc. 562, 614; 2014, c. 749.

§ 64.2-771.
Control and protection of trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and protect the trust property.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.09; 2012, c. 614.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Practice and procedure. —

Successor trustee sufficiently pleaded claims against the former and initial trustee of the trust for breach of fiduciary duty because the successor trustee alleged that an insurance policy to fund a trust lapsed due to lack of a premium payment by the former and initial trustee. Tillar v. Stump, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 155 (Richmond July 3, 2013).

Complaint sufficient. —

In a case alleging the mismanagement of irrevocable trusts, a complaint sufficiently alleged that a trustee and a de facto trustee breached the duty to administer the trusts in the beneficiaries’ favor by taking action to deny them policy proceeds, failed to protect the trust property by allowing the policies to lapse, and failed to provide notice of the impending lapse. Burton v. Dolph, 89 Va. Cir. 101, 2014 Va. Cir. LEXIS 129 (Norfolk June 27, 2014).

§ 64.2-772.
Recordkeeping and identification of trust property.

A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.

A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee’s own property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection D, a trustee shall cause the trust property to be designated so that the interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee or beneficiary.

If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of two or more separate trusts.

A deed or other instrument purporting to convey or transfer real or personal property to a trust instead of to the trustee or trustees of the trust shall be deemed to convey or transfer such property to the trustee or trustees as fully as if made directly to the trustee or trustees.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.10; 2007, c. 197; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (2006).

For
article on 2007 and 2008 legislative and judicial developments in the areas of wills, trusts, and estates, see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (2008).

§ 64.2-773.
Enforcement and defense of claims.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to enforce claims of the trust and to defend claims against the trust.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.11; 2012, c. 614.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Ripeness of suit by beneficiary. —

Although the beneficiary of a sub-trust may have had standing to bring a derivative action against the trustee of the primary trust, personally and in the trustee’s representative capacity, any claims brought on behalf of the sub-trust were not ripe for a derivative action against the trustee because the beneficiary did not allege that the designated trustee of the sub-trust had improperly refused or neglected to bring an action against a third person. Garcia v. Suda, 94 Va. Cir. 246, 2016 Va. Cir. LEXIS 134 (Fairfax County Sept. 6, 2016).

Trust provision prevailed. —

In a case alleging a mismanagement of irrevocable trusts, a demurrer was sustained on a claim that a trustee breached a duty by failing to file causes of action for legal malpractice and conversion because the language of the trust provision at issue made it clear that the trustee retained the option of instituting litigation until it was indemnified against all costs and liabilities, and the complaint failed to allege that the trustee was ever indemnified in such a manner. The trust provision prevailed over statutory law. Burton v. Dolph, 89 Va. Cir. 101, 2014 Va. Cir. LEXIS 129 (Norfolk June 27, 2014).

§ 64.2-774.
Collecting trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to compel a former trustee or other person to deliver trust property to the trustee, and to redress a breach of trust or duty known to the trustee to have been committed by a former trustee or other fiduciary.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.12; 2012, c. 614.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Ripeness of suit by beneficiary. —

Although the beneficiary of a sub-trust may have had standing to bring a derivative action against the trustee of the primary trust, personally and in the trustee’s representative capacity, any claims brought on behalf of the sub-trust were not ripe for a derivative action against the trustee because the beneficiary did not allege that the designated trustee of the sub-trust had improperly refused or neglected to bring an action against a third person. Garcia v. Suda, 94 Va. Cir. 246, 2016 Va. Cir. LEXIS 134 (Fairfax County Sept. 6, 2016).

§ 64.2-775.
Duty to inform and report.

A trustee shall keep the qualified beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed about the administration of the trust and of the material facts necessary for them to protect their interests. Unless unreasonable under the circumstances, a trustee shall promptly respond to a beneficiary’s request for information related to the administration of the trust. A trustee who fails to furnish information to a beneficiary or respond to a request for information regarding the administration of the trust in a good faith belief that to do so would be unreasonable under the circumstances or contrary to the purposes of the settlor shall not be subject to removal or other sanctions therefor.

A trustee:

Upon request of a beneficiary, shall promptly furnish to the beneficiary a copy of the trust instrument;

Within 60 days after accepting a trusteeship, shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of the acceptance and of the trustee’s name, address, and telephone number;

Within 60 days after the date the trustee acquires knowledge of the creation of an irrevocable trust, or the date the trustee acquires knowledge that a formerly revocable trust has become irrevocable, whether by the death of the settlor or otherwise, shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of the trust’s existence, of the identity of the settlor or settlors, of the right to request a copy of the trust instrument, and of the right to a trustee’s report as provided in subsection C; and

Shall notify the qualified beneficiaries in advance of any change in the method or rate of the trustee’s compensation.

A trustee shall send to the distributees or permissible distributees of trust income or principal, and to other qualified or nonqualified beneficiaries who request it, at least annually and at the termination of the trust, a report of the trust property, liabilities, receipts, and disbursements, including the source and amount of the trustee’s compensation, a listing of the trust assets and, if feasible, their respective market values. Upon a vacancy in a trusteeship, unless a cotrustee remains in office, a report shall be sent to the qualified beneficiaries by the former trustee. A personal representative, conservator, or guardian may send the qualified beneficiaries a report on behalf of a deceased or incapacitated trustee.

A beneficiary may waive the right to a trustee’s report or other information otherwise required to be furnished under this section. A beneficiary, with respect to future reports and other information, may withdraw a waiver previously given.

Subdivisions B 2 and B 3 and subsection C apply only to an irrevocable trust created on or after the effective date of this chapter, and to a revocable trust that becomes irrevocable on or after the effective date of this chapter.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.13; 2007, c. 254; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For
article on 2007 and 2008 legislative and judicial developments in the areas of wills, trusts, and estates, see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (2008).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Complaint sufficient. —

In a case alleging the mismanagement of irrevocable trusts, a complaint sufficiently alleged that a trustee and a de facto trustee breached the duty to administer the trusts in the beneficiaries’ favor by taking action to deny them policy proceeds, failed to protect the trust property by allowing the policies to lapse, and failed to provide notice of the impending lapse. Burton v. Dolph, 89 Va. Cir. 101, 2014 Va. Cir. LEXIS 129 (Norfolk June 27, 2014).

§ 64.2-776.
Discretionary powers; tax savings.

Notwithstanding the breadth of discretion granted to a trustee in the terms of the trust, including the use of such terms as “absolute,” “sole,” or “uncontrolled,” the trustee shall exercise a discretionary power in good faith and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries.

Subject to subsection D, and unless the terms of the trust expressly indicate that a rule in this subsection does not apply:

A person other than a settlor who is a beneficiary and trustee of a trust that confers on the trustee a power to make discretionary distributions to or for the trustee’s personal benefit may exercise the power only in accordance with an ascertainable standard; and

A trustee may not exercise a power to make discretionary distributions to satisfy a legal obligation of support that the trustee personally owes another person.For purposes of this subsection, “trustee” includes a person who is deemed to have any power of a trustee, whether because such person has the right to remove or replace any trustee or because a reciprocal trust or power doctrine applies.

A power whose exercise is limited or prohibited by subsection B may be exercised by a majority of the remaining trustees whose exercise of the power is not so limited or prohibited. If the power of all trustees is so limited or prohibited, the court may appoint a special fiduciary with authority to exercise the power.

Subsection B does not apply to:

A power held by the settlor’s spouse who is the trustee of a trust for which a marital deduction, as defined in § 2056(b)(5) or 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on the effective date of this chapter, or as later amended, was previously allowed;

Any trust during any period that the trust may be revoked or amended by its settlor; or

A trust if contributions to the trust qualify for the annual exclusion under § 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on the effective date of this chapter, or as later amended.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.14; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 324.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 324 added the last paragraph in subsection B.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

§ 64.2-777.
General powers of trustee.

A trustee, without authorization by the court, may exercise:

Powers conferred by the terms of the trust; and

Except as limited by the terms of the trust:

All powers over the trust property that an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

Any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management, and distribution of the trust property; and

Any other powers conferred by this chapter.

The exercise of a power is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this article.

Any reference in a trust instrument incorporating the powers authorized under §

64.2-105

shall not be construed to limit powers a trustee may exercise pursuant to this section, unless the settlor expressly states in the trust instrument that such reference should be so construed.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.15; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-778.
Specific powers of trustee.

Without limiting the authority conferred by §

64.2-777

, a trustee may:

Collect trust property and accept or reject additions to the trust property from a settlor or any other person;

Acquire or sell property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale;

Exchange, partition, or otherwise change the character of trust property;

Deposit trust money in an account in a regulated financial service institution;

Borrow money, with or without security, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

With respect to an interest in a proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, corporation, or other form of business or enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take any action that may be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners, including merging, dissolving, or otherwise changing the form of business organization or contributing additional capital;

With respect to stocks or other securities, exercise the rights of an absolute owner, including the right to:

Vote, or give proxies to vote, with or without power of substitution, or enter into or continue a voting trust agreement;

Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title may pass by delivery;

Pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against the securities, and sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; and

Deposit the securities with a depository or other regulated financial service institution;

Pay the expense of any inspection, review, abatement, or remedial action to comply with environmental law;

Any reference in a trust instrument incorporating the powers authorized under §

64.2-105

shall not be construed to limit powers a trustee may exercise pursuant to this section, unless the settlor expressly states in the trust instrument that such reference should be so construed.

8.

With respect to an interest in real property, construct, or make ordinary or extraordinary repairs to, alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or other structures, demolish improvements, raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings, subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use or grant public or private easements, and make or vacate plats and adjust boundaries;

9.

Enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee, including a lease or other arrangement for exploration and removal of natural resources, with or without the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

10.

Grant an option involving a sale, lease, or other disposition of trust property or acquire an option for the acquisition of property, including an option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust, and exercise an option so acquired;

11.

Insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and insure the trustee, the trustee’s agents, and beneficiaries against liability arising from the administration of the trust;

12.

Abandon or decline to administer property of no value or of insufficient value to justify its collection or continued administration;

13.

With respect to possible liability for violation of environmental law:

a.

Inspect or investigate property the trustee holds or has been asked to hold, or property owned or operated by an organization in which the trustee holds or has been asked to hold an interest, for the purpose of determining the application of environmental law with respect to the property;

b.

Take action to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or potential violation of any environmental law affecting property held directly or indirectly by the trustee, whether taken before or after the assertion of a claim or the initiation of governmental enforcement;

c.

Decline to accept property into trust or disclaim any power with respect to property that is or may be burdened with liability for violation of environmental law;

d.

Compromise claims against the trust that may be asserted for an alleged violation of environmental law; and

14.

Pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or against the trust, and release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;

15.

Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the trustee and of employees and agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the administration of the trust;

16.

Exercise elections with respect to federal, state, and local taxes;

17.

Select a mode of payment under any employee benefit or retirement plan, annuity, or life insurance payable to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder, including exercise of the right to indemnification for expenses and against liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect the proceeds;

18.

Make loans out of trust property, including loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances, and the trustee has a lien on future distributions for repayment of those loans;

19.

Pledge trust property to guarantee loans made by others to the beneficiary;

20.

Appoint a trustee to act in another jurisdiction with respect to trust property located in the other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee all of the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that the appointed trustee furnish security, and remove any trustee so appointed;

21.

Pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying it directly to the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary’s benefit, or by:

a.

Paying it to the beneficiary’s conservator or, if the beneficiary does not have a conservator, the beneficiary’s guardian;

b.

Paying it to the beneficiary’s custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (§

64.2-1900

et seq.) or custodial trustee under the Uniform Custodial Trust Act (§

64.2-900

et seq.), and, for that purpose, creating a custodianship or custodial trust;

c.

If the trustee does not know of a conservator, guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee, paying it to an adult relative or other person having legal or physical care or custody of the beneficiary, to be expended on the beneficiary’s behalf; or

d.

Managing it as a separate fund on the beneficiary’s behalf, subject to the beneficiary’s continuing right to withdraw the distribution;

22.

On distribution of trust property or the division or termination of a trust, make distributions in divided or undivided interests, allocate particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust property for those purposes, and adjust for resulting differences in valuation;

23.

Resolve a dispute concerning the interpretation of the trust or its administration by mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative dispute resolution;

24.

Prosecute or defend an action, claim, or judicial proceeding in any jurisdiction to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee’s duties;

25.

Sign and deliver contracts and other instruments that are useful to achieve or facilitate the exercise of the trustee’s powers; and

26.

On termination of the trust, exercise the powers appropriate to wind up the administration of the trust and distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.16; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 10 Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust and a UCC Security Interest.
§ 10.4 The Sale.
Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-250. Fiduciary Powers; No. 15-301. Revocable Inter Vivos Trust Agreement, et seq.; No. 16-6030. Certificate of Trust.

§ 64.2-778.1.
Repealed by Acts 2017, c. 592, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions regarding a trustee’s ability to distribute assets into a second trust, see the Uniform Trust Decanting Act, Article 8.1 (§

64.2-779.1

et seq.) of this chapter.

Editor’s note.

Former §

64.2-778.1

, authorizing trustee’s special power to appoint to a second trust, derived from 2012, c. 559, § 55-548.16:1; 2012, 614; 2014, c. 378.

§ 64.2-779.
Distribution upon termination.

Upon termination or partial termination of a trust, the trustee may send to the beneficiaries a proposal for distribution. The right of any beneficiary to object to the proposed distribution terminates if the beneficiary does not notify the trustee of an objection within 30 days after the proposal was sent but only if the proposal informed the beneficiary of the right to object and of the time allowed for objection.

Upon the occurrence of an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, the trustee shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it, subject to the right of the trustee to retain a reasonable reserve for the payment of debts, expenses, and taxes.

A release by a beneficiary of a trustee from liability for breach of trust is invalid to the extent:

It was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

The beneficiary, at the time of the release, did not know of the beneficiary’s rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

History.

2005, c. 935, § 55-548.17; 2012, c. 614.